Hawaii statutes.
§182-11 Assignment. Any mining lease
may be assigned in whole or in part, subject to the approval of the board, to
an assignee who shall have the same qualifications as any bidder for a mining
lease. The assignee shall be bound by the terms of the lease to the extent as
if the assignee were the original lessee. The approval of the assignment by
the board shall release the assignor from any liabilities or duties under the
mining lease as to the portion thereof assigned except for any liability or
duty which arose prior to the approval of the assignment by the board and which
remains unsatisfied or unperformed. [L 1963, c 11, pt of §1; Supp, §99A-11; HRS
§182-11; am L 2016, c 220, §10]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next